Utah statutes.
78B-6-902.   Deficiency judgment -- Execution.
If it appears that the proceeds of the sale are insufficient and a balance
still remains due, the judgment shall be docketed by the clerk and execution
may be issued for the balance as in other cases.  A general execution may not
be issued until after the sale of the mortgaged property and the application
of the amount realized to the preceding judgment.
